Maine, session 132, LD134.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 1693 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1693
CHILD DANCE CLASS INSTRUCTORS
§9081. Background checks for child dance class instructors
1. Child dance class instructor defined. For the purposes of this chapter, "child dance
class instructor" means an individual who, by virtue of employment, provides children
under 18 years of age structured dance or creative movement classes. "Child dance class
instructor" does not include employees or volunteers of a dance program for children under
18 years of age who are affiliated with a school and those employees or volunteers are
governed by Title 20-A, chapter 502 or individuals who are credentialed employees of a
school, pursuant to Title 20-A, chapter 502, that provides dance programs for children
under 18 years of age.
2. Criminal background check required. A child dance class instructor shall
complete a criminal background check pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with this
section.
3. Rules. The department shall adopt rules requiring a criminal background check that
meets the requirements of 42 United States Code, Section 9858f(b) for a child dance class
instructor. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Department of Health and Human Services; rulemaking. On or before
December 31, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt rules
necessary for the implementation, administration and enforcement of criminal background
checks for child dance class instructors pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22,
section 9081.
Sec. 3. Department of Health and Human Services; report. By December 3,
2025, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a report to the Joint
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services regarding the status of rulemaking
requiring criminal background checks of child dance class instructors pursuant to the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 9081 and including any recommendations regarding
necessary statutory changes to facilitate the rulemaking. The department may include in
the report any recommendations for the licensing of child dance class instructors.